apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="стільк/и__prn"> <!-- tyle -->
      <e><p>          <l>и</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ом</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ома</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="скільк/ись__prn">  <!-- ileś -->
      <e><p>          <l>ись</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>омсь</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>омась</l><r>ись<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="скільк/и-небудь__prn">  <!-- ile bądź -->
      <e><p>          <l>и-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ом-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ох-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ома-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="казна-скільк/и__prn">  <!-- nie wiadomo ile ~ ilekolwiek -->
      <e><p>          <l>и</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>омсь</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>охсь</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>омась</l><r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="хтось__prn"> <!-- ktoś -->
      <e><p>          <l>хтось</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>когось</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>когось</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>комусь</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>комусь</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>кімсь</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>кимось</l><r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ніхто__prn"> <!-- nikt -->
      <e><p>          <l>ніхто</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нікого</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нікого</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нікому</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нікому</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>нікім</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ніким</l><r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ніщо__prn"> <!-- nic -->
      <e><p>          <l>ніщо</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нічого</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нічого</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нічому</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нічому</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>нічім</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>нічим</l><r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <pardef n="як/ий__prn"> <!-- jaki -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ий<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="котр/ий__det"> <!-- który -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ий<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="котр/ий__prn"> <!-- który -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ий<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="щось__prn"> <!-- coś -->
      <e><p>          <l>щось</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>щось</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чогось</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чомусь</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чомусь</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> <!--чімсь-->
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>чімсь</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> <!--чімсь-->
      <e><p>          <l>чимось</l><r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="що__prn"> <!-- co -->
      <e><p>          <l>що</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>що</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чого</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чому</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>чому</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> <!--чім-->
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>чім</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> <!--чім-->
      <e><p>          <l>чим</l><r>що<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!--end of pronouns-->

    <e lm="котрий"><i>котр</i><par n="котр/ий__det"/></e>
    <e lm="котрий"><i>котр</i><par n="котр/ий__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="стільки"><i>стільк</i><par n="стільк/и__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="скількись"><i>скільк</i><par n="скільк/ись__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="скільки-небудь"><i>скільк</i><par n="скільк/и-небудь__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="казна-скільки"><i>казна-скільк</i><par n="казна-скільк/и__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="хтось"><i></i><par n="хтось__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ніхто"><i></i><par n="ніхто__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="що"><i></i><par n="що__prn"/></e>
